Utah statutes.
26-36a-102.   Legislative findings.

(1)  The Legislature finds that there is an important state purpose to improve the access of Medicaid patients to quality care in Utah hospitals because of continuous decreases in state revenues and increases in enrollment under the Utah Medicaid program.

(2)  The Legislature finds that in order to improve this access to those persons described in Subsection (1):

(a)  the rates paid to Utah hospitals shall be adequate to encourage and support improved access; and

(b)  adequate funding shall be provided to increase the rates paid to Utah hospitals providing services pursuant to the Utah Medicaid program.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

